Washington statutes.
RCW 21.20.880

Small securities offerings—Exemptions—Annual reports—Disqualification provisions—Rules.

(1) Any offer or sale of a security is exempt from RCW 21.20.040 through 21.20.300 and 21.20.327, except as expressly provided, if:

(a) The issuer first files the offering with the director and the director declares the offering exempt;

(b) The offering is conducted in accordance with an applicable exemption from registration under the securities act of 1933;

(c) The issuer is an entity doing business in the state of Washington;

(d) The issuer files with the director an escrow agreement providing that all offering proceeds will be released to the issuer only when the aggregate capital raised from all investors equals or exceeds the minimum target offering, as determined by the director;

(e) The aggregate purchase price of all securities sold by an issuer pursuant to the exemption provided by this section does not exceed one million dollars during any twelve-month period;

(f) The aggregate amount sold to any investor, other than an "accredited investor" as that term is defined under the securities act of 1933, by one or more issuers during the twelve-month period preceding the date of the sale does not exceed:

(i) The greater of two thousand dollars or five percent of the annual income or net worth of the investor, as applicable, if either the annual income or the net worth of the investor is less than one hundred thousand dollars; or

(ii) Ten percent of the annual income or net worth of the investor, as applicable, up to one hundred thousand dollars, if either the annual income or net worth of the investor is one hundred thousand dollars or more;

(g) The investor acknowledges by manual or electronic signature the following statement conspicuously presented at the time of sale on a page separate from other information relating to the offering: "I acknowledge that I am investing in a high-risk, speculative business venture, that I may lose all of my investment, and that I can afford the loss of my investment";

(h) The issuer reasonably believes that all purchasers are purchasing for investment and not for sale in connection with a distribution of the security; and

(i) The issuer and investor provide any other information reasonably requested by the director.

(2) Attempted compliance with the exemption provided by this section does not act as an exclusive election. The issuer may claim any other applicable exemption.

(3) For as long as securities issued under the exemption provided by this section are outstanding, the issuer shall provide an annual report to the issuer's shareholders and the director no later than one hundred twenty days after the end of the fiscal year covered by the report. An issuer may provide the report to its shareholders by posting a copy of the report on the issuer's website. The report must contain the following information:

(a) Executive officer and director compensation, including specifically the cash compensation earned by the executive officers and directors since the previous report and on an annual basis, and any bonuses or other compensation, including stock options or other rights to receive equity securities of the issuer or any affiliate of the issuer, received by them; and

(b) A brief analysis by management of the issuer of the business operations and financial condition of the issuer.

(4) Securities issued under the exemption provided by this section may not be transferred by the purchaser during a one-year period beginning on the date of purchase, unless the securities are transferred:

(a) To the issuer of the securities;

(b) To an accredited investor;

(c) As part of a registered offering; or

(d) To a member of the family of the purchaser or the equivalent, or in connection with the death or divorce or other similar circumstances, in the discretion of the director.

(5) The director shall adopt disqualification provisions under which this exemption shall not be available to any person or its predecessors, affiliates, officers, directors, underwriters, or other related persons. The provisions shall be substantially similar to the disqualification provisions adopted by the securities and exchange commission pursuant to the requirements of section 401(b)(2) of the Jobs act of 2012 or, if none, as adopted in Rule 506 of Regulation D. Notwithstanding the foregoing, this exemption shall become available on June 12, 2014.

(6) Any type of equity or convertible debt security may be offered under the exemption provided under this section.

(7) Subject to RCW 21.20.450, the director may adopt, amend, or repeal rules to implement this section, including the establishment of filing and transaction fees sufficient to cover the costs of administering this section.

[ 2017 c 113 s 1; 2014 c 144 s 3.]

NOTES:

Short title—2014 c 144: "This act may be known and cited as the Washington jobs act of 2014." [ 2014 c 144 s 1.]

Findings—Intent—2014 c 144: "The legislature finds that start-up companies play a critical role in creating new jobs and revenues. Crowdfunding, or raising money through small contributions from a large number of investors, allows smaller enterprises to access the capital they need to get new businesses off the ground. The legislature further finds that the costs of state securities registration often outweigh the benefits to Washington start-ups seeking to make small securities offerings and that the use of crowdfunding for business financing in Washington is significantly restricted by state securities laws. Helping new businesses access equity crowdfunding within certain boundaries will democratize venture capital and facilitate investment by Washington residents in Washington start-ups while protecting consumers and investors. For these reasons, the legislature intends to provide Washington businesses and investors the opportunity to benefit from equity crowdfunding." [ 2014 c 144 s 2.]